Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3803
Insurance laws; applicability.

The insurance laws of this state including sections 44-3801 to 44-3826 shall not apply to:

(1) Retainer contracts made by dentists with individual patients with fees based on estimates of the nature and amount of services to be provided to the specific patient and similar contracts made with a group of patients involved in the same or closely related dental matters;

(2) Plans providing no benefits other than consultation and advice in connection with or in combination with referral services; and

(3) The furnishing of limited dental assistance on an informal basis, involving neither an express contractual obligation nor reasonable expectations, in the context of an employment, membership, education, or similar relationship.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 3.